Hawaii statutes.
§533-8 Widow's right to remain in husband's
house. A widow may remain in the house of her husband sixty days after his
death, without being chargeable with rent therefor. In the meantime she shall
have her reasonable sustenance out of his estate. [CC 1859, §1306; RL 1925,
§3024; RL 1935, §4837; RL 1945, §12107; RL 1955, §319-8; HRS §533-8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next